Montana, session 2025, HB931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 77-1-902, MCA, is amended to read:
"77-1-902. Definitions. As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise, the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Attainable workforce housing" has the same meaning as provided in 90-6-143.
(2) "Cancellation" means the cessation of a lessee's possessory rights and privileges under a
lease due to the lessee's breach of some term of the lease, applicable statutes, or applicable administrative
rules.
(2)(3) "Commercial lease" means a contract to use state trust land for a commercial purpose.
(3)(4) (a) "Commercial purpose" means an industrial enterprise, retail sales outlet, business and
professional office building, warehouse, motel, hotel, hospitality enterprise, commercial or concentrated
recreational use, single-family or multifamily residential development authorized under a lease with a master
lessee, including a lease executed with a nonprofit corporation for the purposes of developing attainable
workforce housing, and other similar business.
(b) The term does not include the following uses:
(i) agriculture;
(ii) grazing;
(iii) exploration or development of oil and gas, minerals, and resources from geothermal, wind, or
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 931
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 931
solar;
(iv) single-family residences, home sites, and cabin sites licensed or leased pursuant to 77-1-208;
and
(v) utility rights-of-way.
(4)(5) "Land value" is the monetary value of the land determined by an appraisal by a certified
general appraiser or a department staff appraiser or by a limited valuation.
(5)(6) "Limited valuation" means estimating the land value of commercial lease land by analyzing
comparable land valuations conducted within 2 years of the lease commencement date as provided by real
estate appraisers, local tax assessors, local realtors, an evaluation of local market rents, or a combination of
those methods.
(6)(7) "Termination" means the automatic completion or ending of the term of a contract according to
its provisions. Upon termination, the lessee ceases to have any possessory rights or privileges under a lease."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 931
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 931, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 931
INTRODUCED BY C. SCHOMER, L. BREWSTER, M. VINTON
AN ACT CLARIFYING THAT A COMMERCIAL PURPOSE FOR THE COMMERCIAL LEASING OF STATE
TRUST LAND MAY INCLUDE DEVELOPMENT OF SINGLE-FAMILY OR MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL
DEVELOPMENT UNDER A MASTER LEASE FOR THE PURPOSES OF ATTAINABLE WORKFORCE
HOUSING; REVISING DEFINITIONS; AND AMENDING SECTION 77-1-902, MCA.”